Utah statutes.
53A-8a-409.   State Board of Education to establish a framework for the evaluation of educators.

The State Board of Education shall make rules:

(1)  establishing a framework for the evaluation of educators that is consistent with the requirements of Part 3, Employee Evaluations, and this part;

(2)  requiring a teacher's summative evaluation to be based on:

(a)  student learning growth or achievement, if measures of student learning growth are not available; and

(b)  standards of instructional quality; and

(3)  requiring each school district to fully implement an evaluation system for educators in accordance with the framework established by the State Board of Education no later than the 2014-15 school year.

